Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4534.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin RESIDENTIAL MENTAL HEALTH TREATMENT SERVICES FOR INDIVIDUALS WITH PHYSICAL DISABILITIES GRANTS.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Grants authorized. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner of human services must award grants to develop programs, build or renovate facilities, and provide residential mental health treatment services for individuals with physical disabilities. Grants under this section may be awarded to organizations with demonstrated experience providing mental health treatment services in residential programs, as defined in Minnesota Statutes, section 245I.02, subdivision 34, and providing specialized services for individuals with physical disabilities. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner must develop a request for proposals, and grant applicants must apply for grants in a form and manner prescribed by the commissioner. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Use of grant money. new text end new text begin Grant money awarded under this section may be used for: new text end new text begin (1) costs of construction or physical renovations to accommodate the needs of individuals with physical disabilities and improve accessibility; new text end new text begin (2) ongoing facilities maintenance costs; new text end new text begin (3) administrative expenses and staffing costs; and new text end new text begin (4) specialized training for staff on providing mental health treatment services to individuals with physical disabilities. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Report required. new text end new text begin By December 15, 2027, the commissioner must submit a report to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over health and human services. The report must include the number of grants awarded under this section and the amounts of each grant awarded, list the grantees, and specify the purposes for which the grants were used. The report must also include any relevant findings, recommendations, results, or outcomes of the grant program. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin APPROPRIATION; RESIDENTIAL MENTAL HEALTH TREATMENT SERVICES FOR INDIVIDUALS WITH PHYSICAL DISABILITIES GRANTS.new text end new text begin $....... in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of human services for residential mental health treatment services for individuals with physical disabilities grants. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end